California statutes. Public Resources Code
The operation of any corporation formed pursuant to this article shall, in addition to the requirements of this article, be subject to any stipulations or provisions contained in any contract which may be entered into between the corporation and the corporation or agency established under the authority of the federal government which may have loaned or advanced funds for the operations of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Wildland Fire Prevention and Vegetation Management [4740. - 4743.]

4740.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The department has extensive technical expertise in wildland fire prevention and vegetation management on forest, range, and watershed lands. When appropriately applied, this expertise can have significant public resource benefits, including decreasing
 high-intensity wildland fires, improving watershed management, range improvement, improving vegetation management, forest improvement, wildlife habitat improvement, restoring ecological integrity and resilience, improving community wildfire protection, improving carbon resilience, providing enhancement of culturally important resources, and maintenance of air quality.

(b) Because of the scope of the problem of high-intensity wildland fires and expertise of the department, local governments, including cities, counties, and special districts, need assistance in preventing future problems resulting from inadequate fire prevention planning and vegetation management.

(c) California will benefit if existing state expertise is made available to local governments, including
 cities, counties, and special districts, thereby integrating those efforts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 755, Sec. 1.   (AB 1570)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4741.

(a) In accordance with policies established by the board, the department shall assist local governments in preventing future high-intensity wildland fires and instituting appropriate fuels management by making its wildland fire prevention and vegetation management expertise available to local governments to the extent possible within the department’s budgetary limitations.

(b) Any department recommendations made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be advisory in nature and local governments shall not be required to follow those recommendations.

 (c) This section does not alter the existing obligations of a local government or affect the existing liability of any local government.

(d) For purposes of this section, “local governments” include cities, counties, and special districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 755, Sec. 2.   (AB 1570)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4742.

(a) The state recognizes the problem of recruitment and retention of foresters who engage in fuel reduction at the department. Due to the continuing need to recruit new foresters to fill vacancies, retain seasoned fuel reduction experts, reduce turnover rates, and provide comparability in pay to effectively compete with other positions at the department and ensure necessary staffing levels, salaries and classifications should be improved and maintained by the department.

(b) To carry out the intent of subdivision (a), the department shall take into consideration the salary, classification, and recruitment efforts for its personnel that conducts fuel reduction to fill vacancies and retain seasoned fuel reduction experts.

(c) The department shall, to the extent feasible, engage in recruitment efforts with California Native American tribes, tribal organizations, and cultural fire practitioners to fill vacancies in positions that engage in fuel reduction on behalf of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 375, Sec. 15.   (AB 642)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4743.

(a) For purposes of this section, “environmentally sensitive vegetation management” means vegetation management that reduces catastrophic wildfire risk over the long term while supporting native wildlife and biodiversity.

(b) For purposes of this section, “type conversion” means the process of dominant native plant species, including, but not limited to, native shrubs, being significantly reduced or extirpated and nonnative species colonizing an area due to disturbance events, including, but not limited to, wildfire incidents. For purposes of this section, “type conversion” does not include the removal of native species to make room for other native, but
 underrepresented, vegetation.

(c) For a grant program that funds an environmentally sensitive vegetation management project, a state public entity shall consider incorporating into its funding guidelines all of the following criteria:

(1) Follows the
 principles of integrated pest management as defined in Section 11401.7 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(2) Implements measures to support native plant health and biodiversity.

(3) Maximizes long-term risk reduction of catastrophic wildfire.

(4) Uses
 monitoring plans, as determined by the funding entity, and incorporates monitoring before, during, and after vegetation management treatments.

(5) Uses methods that mimic natural disturbance processes to maintain rare habitats.

(6) Times vegetation management to minimize
 the potential impacts to wildlife and minimize the reproduction of invasive plants.

(7) Minimizes erosion impacts from vegetation management.

(8) Includes consultation with native plant botanists and land management experts.

(9) Leaves buffers
 around bodies of water to protect watershed health.

(10) Uses prescribed grazing, as defined in Section 4004.5, where applicable.

(11) Avoids habitat type conversion.

(12) Implements measures to avoid impacts to rare or sensitive
 species and habitats, in consultation with relevant agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 778, Sec. 2.   (SB 653)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Sudden Oak Death Management Act of 2002 [4750. - 4750.7.]

4750.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Sudden Oak Death Management Act of 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4750.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The need for expanding the current efforts to slow the spread of sudden oak death grows more urgent with the discovery of each new plant host and the spread of the disease to an increasing number of counties.

(b) The cause of sudden oak death, a fungus known as Phytophthora ramorum, has only recently been discovered. There is currently no known cure for trees and other plant species infected with this fungus, leaving removal as the only current option. Although costly, infected trees and other plant species can be removed.

(c) Ten counties have now confirmed the presence of sudden oak death in several trees and other plant species. The counties are Marin, Sonoma, Monterey, Mendocino, Napa, San Mateo, Santa Cruz, Santa Clara, Solano, and Alameda. Trees and other plant species in several other counties are potentially affected with sudden oak death, but are not yet confirmed.

(d) In addition to the tens of thousands of tanoaks (Lithocarpus densiflorus), coast live oaks (Quercus agrifolia), and black oaks (Quercus kelloggii) that are currently dying of Phytophthora ramorum, the fungus has also been confirmed in Shreve’s oak (Quercus parvula, var. shrevei), rhododendron (Rhododendron species, except azaleas), California bay laurel (Umbellularia californica), madrone (Arbutus menziesii), huckleberry (Vaccinium ovatum), arrowwood (Viburnum x bodnantense), bigleaf maple (Acer macrophyllum), California buckeye (Aesculus californica), California coffeeberry (Rhamnus californica), a honeysuckle (Lonicera hispidula), manzanita (Arctostaphylos manzanita), and Toyon or Christmas berry (Heteromeles arbutifolia). Several more species are suspected of infestation.

(e) Research is urgently needed to determine the range of host trees and other plants that may be infected, to help develop sufficient control strategies.

(f) There is now a significant danger that sudden oak death may spread to other regions of California, other states, or countries. Currently, federal agencies, California, Oregon, Canada, and South Korea have imposed quarantines in an attempt to halt the spread of the fungus.

(g) The effect of the spread of this devastating disease is potentially disastrous: massive die-offs of oak trees covering thousands of acres; a serious increase in fire threats in areas that include densely populated areas; a dramatic change in forest cover and ecosystems with a devastating effect on California’s wildlife; and severe consequences to California’s economy, including threats to tourism and the continued sale of nursery stock and forest products.

(h) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide continuing funding to the Resources Agency for its program to combat sudden oak death. Funding is necessary to address this situation quickly and adequately, and to ensure that necessary actions are taken to protect the public safety and the environment. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, with recommendations from the California Oak Mortality Task Force, administer this program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4750.2.

As used in this article, “task force” means the California Oak Mortality Task Force.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4750.3.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state, to the extent feasible, to stop the spread of sudden oak death and conserve oak trees and other plant species affected by the disease. The purpose of this article is to accomplish all of the following:

(a) Prevent the introduction and spread within this state of sudden oak death caused by Phytophthora ramorum.

(b) Reduce or eliminate the loss of oak trees and other plant species infected with Phytophthora ramorum.

(c) Encourage the coordination of efforts between federal, state, and local agencies and organizations to effectively allocate resources to manage Phytophthora ramorum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4750.4.

(a) (1) The department shall implement a program to detect, remove, and treat, if possible, trees infected with Phytophthora ramorum. This program shall encourage tree management and replanting in urban and other infected areas and assist counties in seeking innovative solutions to problems caused by Phytophthora ramorum.

(2) The department is primarily responsible for carrying out the intent of this article in cooperation with the task force and other private and public entities or persons and appropriate local, state, and federal agencies.

(b) (1) The department shall cooperate with those agencies of the federal government that have powers and duties concerning forestry, and shall perform all actions necessary to secure for this state the benefits of federal forestry programs.

(2) To facilitate the implementation of this article, the director may enter into agreements and contracts with any public or private entity, including any local agency, that has forestry related jurisdictional responsibilities. The director may consult with those entities and agencies when carrying out the objectives of this article.

(c) The director shall take all necessary steps to prevent or retard the introduction, establishment, and spread of Phytophthora ramorum.

(d) The department and the Department of Food and Agriculture shall cooperate in setting quarantine boundary lines, if necessary, and in enforcing the provisions relating to plant quarantine and pest control in Division 4 (commencing with Section 5001) of the Food and Agricultural Code if a quarantine is established with regard to Phytophthora ramorum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4750.5.

(a) The department shall provide information and technical assistance to cities, counties, districts, regional entities, homeowner neighborhood groups, and nonprofit organizations on Phytophthora ramorum.

(b) The department and any other state agency may assist local tree maintenance programs by loaning surplus equipment for regional and local urban forestry. Eligible programs shall include, but are not limited to, urban tree care by nonprofit organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4750.6.

The director, with advice from the task force, may enter into contracts to provide assistance for project costs associated with the implementation of this article. Eligible projects shall include all of the following:

(a) Infected tree detection, including coordination of local agency efforts and citizen involvement.

(b) Funding for seedlings, tree stock, and replanting.

(c) Other categories of projects recommended by the task force and approved by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4750.7.

(a) (1) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall expend funds, subject to appropriation in the Budget Act, on sudden oak death management activities pursuant to this section. The department shall take into account the recommendations of the task force for the expenditure of the funds.

(2) The department shall expend the funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision to take various actions to control the spread of Phytophthora ramorum, to find effective treatments to prevent or eliminate sudden oak death, and to assist state and local agencies and private property owners to perform, identify, remove, and appropriately dispose of trees and plants that have become infected or expired due to sudden oak death.

(3) (A) Of the amount to be expended pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall expend the amount of funds it deems necessary on sudden oak death monitoring including, but not limited to, open-space surveys, roadside surveys, aerial surveys, monitoring technique workshops, development of baseline information on the distribution, condition, and mortality rates of oaks in California, and maintaining an up-to-date geographic information system database.

(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), of the amount to be expended pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall expend not less than 35 percent on sudden oak death management activities pursuant to contracts with counties, which may include, but need not be limited to, hazard tree assessment, contracts with counties for hazard tree removal pursuant to the process established by clause (iii), biomass utilization, assessment and management of restoration and mitigation options, establishment and operation of demonstration projects, including green waste treatment facilities, and grants to counties for oak tree restoration pursuant to the process established by clause (iv). The department shall first endeavor to contract directly with the affected county. If the county declines to enter into a contract, or if the county has not commenced the process established by clause (iii) within 60 days of notification by the department of the need for a contract with the affected county, the department may enter into one or more contracts with one or more other appropriate entities at the local level.

(ii) Of the amount of funds appropriated in the Budget Act of 2002 that is expended under this subdivision, the department shall expend not less than seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) pursuant to clause (i).

(iii) The department shall utilize a portion of the funds to be expended pursuant to this subparagraph to contract with affected counties for the removal of trees that have died or are dying as a result of sudden oak death. An affected county may apply to the department for a contract, and shall provide the department with an action plan for the removal and disposition of affected trees within its jurisdiction. The department shall approve or deny an affected county’s action plan in a timely manner. If the department approves the action plan of an affected county, the department may enter into a contract with that county. The department shall consider the recommendation of the task force prior to approving or denying a county action plan and prior to entering into a contract under this clause. An action plan approved by the board prior to January 1, 2003, is deemed sufficient to comply with this section.

(iv) The department shall utilize a portion of the funds to be expended pursuant to this subparagraph to contract with affected counties for activities designed to restore oak trees in areas that have been affected by sudden oak death. An affected county may apply to the department for these funds, and provide the department with an action plan for the restoration of affected trees within its jurisdiction. The department shall approve or deny an affected county’s action plan in a timely manner. If the department approves the action plan of an affected county, the department may enter into a contract with that county. The department shall consider the recommendations of the task force prior to approving or denying a county action plan and prior to entering into a contract under this clause. The department may reallocate to other sudden oak death management activities authorized under this section any amount allocated under this subdivision and not expended within one year after the date it was originally allocated.

(C) Of the amount to be expended pursuant to this subdivision, the department may expend the amount of funds it deems necessary on research activities, including, but not limited to, research on forest pathology and Phytophthora ecology, forest insects associated with oak decline, urban forestry and arboriculture, forest ecology, fire management and silviculture, genetic resistance, ecosystem impacts, and landscape ecology, epidemiology, and monitoring techniques.

(D) Of the amount to be expended pursuant to this subdivision, the department may expend the amount of funds it deems necessary on education activities, including, but not limited to, support for two regional education project coordinators, one public information officer, Internet Web site design and maintenance training, and development and distribution of educational materials on sudden oak death for homeowners, arborists, urban foresters, park managers, public works personnel, utility crews, recreationists, nursery workers, landscapers, naturalists, and firefighting personnel.

(E) Of the amount to be expended pursuant to this subdivision, the department may expend the amount of funds it deems necessary on fire protection and prevention activities, including, but not limited to, assessing fire risk in heavily impacted areas, inspecting property to encourage increased clearing of vegetation in heavily infested areas and to mitigate the fire risk, producing and distributing safety information for firefighters working in areas affected by sudden oak death, and treating vegetation to prevent fire.

(F) Of the amount to be expended pursuant to this subdivision, the department may expend the amount of funds it deems necessary to fund administrative activities necessary to oversee the activities listed in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, including, but not limited to, an overall statewide task force coordinator, miscellaneous expenses associated with the operation of the task force, and staff of the department to carry out contract preparation, administration, and fiscal audits of contract expenditures.

(b) Of the amount to be expended under this section, the department may allocate funds to the Department of Food and Agriculture for regulatory activities, including, but not limited to, nursery surveys and other regulatory enforcement activities performed by agricultural commissioners, diagnostic services, and public agency coordination efforts. Of the amount allocated to be expended under this subdivision, the department may expend the amount of funds it deems necessary to fund administrative activities necessary to oversee the activities listed in this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 224, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Conservation Easements on Forested Lands [4751. - 4752.]

4751.

(a) (1) Except as provided in Section 4752, this section shall apply to any conservation easement, as defined in Section 815.1 of the Civil Code, contracted for purchase with state funds on or after January 1, 2023, wherein land subject to the easement is composed of existing forest lands, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 12220, covering at least 40 acres, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) The 40-acre minimum in paragraph (1) shall not apply if the land subject to the easement has been zoned as a timberland production zone pursuant to Section 51112 or 51113 of the Government Code, and as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 51104 of the Government Code.

(3) This section shall not apply to a conservation trail easement when the primary purpose is for public access to a trail.

(b) To the extent not in conflict with federal law, the terms of any applicable bond, or the requirements of any other funding source, the landowner shall agree, as part of the easement management plan, to maintain and improve forest health through promotion of a more natural tree density, species composition, structure, and habitat function, to make improvements that increase the land’s ability to provide resilient, long-term carbon sequestration and net carbon stores as well as watershed functions, to provide for the retention of larger trees and a natural range of age classes, and to ensure the growth and retention of these larger trees over time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 131, Sec. 2.   (AB 2966)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4752.

For any conservation easement purchased with state funds on or after January 1, 2019, to December 31, 2022, inclusive, wherein land subject to the easement includes some forest lands, or consists completely of forest lands, to the extent not in conflict with federal law, the terms of any applicable bond, or the requirements of any other funding source, the landowner shall agree, as part of the easement management plan, to maintain and improve forest health through promotion of a more natural tree density, species composition structure, and habitat function, to make improvements that increase the land’s ability to provide resilient, long-term carbon sequestration and net carbon stores as well as watershed functions, to provide for the retention of larger trees and a natural range of age classes, and to ensure the growth and
 retention of these larger trees over time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 131, Sec. 2.   (AB 2966)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. California Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan Goals [4770. - 4771.6.]

4770.

For purposes of this article, “task force” has the same meaning as the task force described in Section 4005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 387, Sec. 2.   (SB 456)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4771.

(a) On January 1, 2022, the task force, including, but not limited to, the Natural Resources Agency, the California Environmental Protection Agency, the Office of Planning and Research, and the department, in coordination with the relevant lead federal, state, local, and tribal agencies, shall develop a comprehensive implementation strategy to track and ensure the achievement of the goals and key actions identified in the state’s “Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan” issued by the task force in January 2021.

(b) The implementation strategy required by subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, the identification of lead agencies and a description of the activities completed and still necessary to achieve the goals and key actions identified in
 the state’s “Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan.” Implementation that is appropriate to the state’s different regions shall be included in the strategy.

(c) The implementation strategy required by subdivision (a) shall, in addition to the contents identified in subdivision (b), address all of the following actions:

(1) Increasing the pace and scale of wildfire and forest resilience activities. This includes all of the following:

(A) A joint strategy to annually treat 500,000 acres of federal land and 500,000 acres of nonfederal land by 2025. The type of the treatments shall be monitored, tracked, and reported pursuant to subdivision (e).

(B) A comprehensive strategy, developed in partnership with state agencies that own state land, to expand
 forest management and improve the health and resilience of forested state lands.

(C) A comprehensive program to coordinate and align state and federal assistance programs for small private landowners, including grant programs, stewardship education workshops, and postfire rapid response teams.

(D) A strategic action plan to expand the use of prescribed fire.

(E) Expansion of the Department of Conservation’s Regional Fire and Forest Capacity Program through the development of a statewide network of regional forest and community fire resilience plans.

(F) A comprehensive statewide reforestation strategy.

(G) A permit synchronization plan to align permitting under the Z’berg-Nejedly Forest
 Practice Act of 1973 (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511)) and forest practice rules and regulations adopted by the board with relevant permitting and regulatory requirements of the State Water Resources Control Board, the applicable regional water quality control boards, and the Department of Fish and Wildlife. The permit synchronization plan shall ensure, to the extent feasible, that the board, the department, the State Water Resources Control Board, the applicable regional water quality control boards, and the Department of Fish and Wildlife align their permitting requirements in order to reduce regulatory barriers for fire prevention and forest resilience activities.

(H) A science-based review and recommendations to guide and inform state investments and regional strategies on actions needed to improve the health and fire resilience of chaparral, shrublands, and surrounding communities.

(2) Strengthening the protection of communities and reducing their fire risk, including all of the following:

(A) A statewide framework, including performance measures, to support local and regional community fire risk reduction and adaptation programs and projects.

(B) Development and maintenance of a network of more than 500 fuel break projects across the state.

(C) Expansion and modernization of existing defensible space and home hardening programs, particularly targeting high fire threat communities, including, but not limited to, inclusion of the ember-resistant zone and assistance programs for defensible space and home hardening, with priority given to the most vulnerable communities in the state.

(D) Strengthening of investor-owned utility wildfire mitigation plans.

(E) A framework for collaborative fuels reduction projects to protect roadway travelers and communities along highways, and to reduce roadside ignitions along primary and secondary emergency evacuation routes.

(F) A Smoke Ready California campaign to provide coordinated messaging and content to help Californians plan for and protect themselves from wildfire smoke impacts.

(3) Creating a sustainable wood products market in California, including both of the following:

(A) A comprehensive framework and market strategy to align the state’s wood use policies and priorities, and to create economic opportunities for the use of forest materials that store carbon, reduce
 emissions, and contribute to sustainable local economies.

(B) A catalyst fund to provide low-cost financing for businesses that use forest biomass and encourage private sector innovation.

(4) Sustaining and expanding outdoor recreation on forestland, including both of the following:

(A) Updating the Department of Parks and Recreation’s Statewide Comprehensive Outdoor Recreation Plan (SCORP).

(B) Creating a joint strategy with the United States Forest Service to expand sustainable recreation across the state’s forested regions, emphasizing equitable access to underserved communities and rural recreation-dependent communities.

(5) Protecting and expanding urban canopy and forestry, including
 a comprehensive program, with regional targets, to significantly increase California’s urban tree canopy, targeting disadvantaged and low-income communities and low-canopy areas.

(6) Driving innovation and measuring progress in achieving these goals, including both of the following:

(A) An applied research plan.

(B) A forest data hub to serve as a multiple institutional clearinghouse for supporting, integrating, evaluating, and synthesizing reporting and monitoring efforts.

(d) In developing the implementation strategy required by subdivision (a), the task force shall seek to coordinate and integrate the implementation strategy with the key goals and priorities of all of the following frameworks:

(1) The Natural and Working Lands Climate Smart Strategy, the Pathways to 30x30 Document, and biodiversity strategies, all developed pursuant to Executive Order No. N-82-20.

(2) The state’s climate adaptation strategy, known as the Safeguarding California Plan, adopted pursuant to Section 71153.

(3) The 2022 scoping plan update, and subsequent updates, developed pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(4) Any other related natural resources policy frameworks.

(e) (1) On or before January 1, 2023, and annually thereafter
 on or before March 1, until
 March 1, 2048, the task force shall submit, as part of the implementation strategy required pursuant to subdivision (a), a report to the appropriate policy and budget committees of the Legislature on progress made in achieving the goals and key actions identified in the state’s “Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan,” on state expenditures made to implement these key actions, and on additional resources and policy changes needed to achieve these goals and key actions.

(2) (A) The annual report described in paragraph (1) shall also include information on the prior year’s acreage treatment goals, including treatment described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), to (i) ensure compliance with the goals and (ii) assess annually additional resource requirements to achieve those goals. Metrics for reporting shall include total acres treated, type of treatment,
 level of risk for catastrophic fires within treated areas, statewide fire risk reduction, acres that received maintenance treatment, and resources expended for treatment, including resources expended for implementation and alignment of relevant permitting and regulatory requirements of the board, the department, the State Water Resources Control Board, the applicable regional water quality control boards, and the Department of Fish and Wildlife for fire prevention and forest resilience activities and barriers to treatment, if any.

(B) Information contained in the report required pursuant to Section 4137 may be incorporated by reference, as applicable, to comply with the annual report required pursuant to this subdivision.

(C) When establishing yearly treatment goals, described in subparagraph (A), the task force shall use the most advanced predictive tools to determine priority areas for treatment, with the goal of most effectively and efficiently reducing the overall fire risk to the state and achieving other goals outlined in this article.

(3) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the requirement for submitting a report to the Legislature pursuant to this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2052.

(f) On or before March
 1, 2026, and every five years thereafter, the task force, or its successor entity, shall update the state’s “Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan.” The Natural Resources Agency shall coordinate development of the update with the related state frameworks identified in subdivision (d), and with the phased development of the 20-year plan identified in the “Agreement for Shared Stewardship of California’s Forests and Rangelands” entered into between the state and the Pacific Southwest Region of the United States Forest Service.

(g) The task force shall invite the participation of the United States Forest Service and other federal entities, as applicable, in the creation, alignment, and coordination of joint efforts pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 36.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4771.6.

(a) On or before June 30, 2025, the task force, in consultation with the Range Management Advisory Committee of the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection, established pursuant to Section 741, shall develop a strategic action plan to expand the use of prescribed grazing to support the state’s efforts to increase the pace and scale of wildfire and forest resilience activities and strengthen the protection of communities and reduce their fire risk.

(b) The plan shall include a focus on reducing wildfire risk in and near “fire-threatened communities,” as that term is defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 4124.5.

(c) The strategic action plan shall include a
 component on monitoring and evaluating the effectiveness of prescribed grazing on reducing wildfire risk, including near communities, and the impacts of prescribed grazing on forest and wildland health, promoting the diversity and abundance of native species, and decreasing the abundance of invasive species.

(d) The task force shall consider incorporating prescribed grazing in the January 1, 2026, update to the state’s “Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 772, Sec. 3.   (SB 675)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Range and Forage Lands [4781. - 4788.]



  ARTICLE 2. Land Protection and Improvement [4781. - 4788.]

4781.

The people of the state have a direct interest in the protection and improvement of public and private lands which are principally used or useful for range or forage purposes for domestic livestock and wildlife. This article is enacted in furtherance of that interest to provide not only for controlled land clearance and revegetation of such lands but also having as its objective fire prevention and protection, watershed protection and conservation, and the prevention of soil erosion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4782.

This article shall be administered by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4783.

The department may enter into contracts or cooperative agreements with any person, firm, public or private corporation, district, or municipal corporation, or other political subdivision of the state, or any group or combination of them, that owns or controls brush-covered land within any state responsibility area for the purpose of engaging in controlled land clearance and revegetation, including the burning of brush from such lands, or portions of such lands, under the supervision of the department or by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4784.

In furtherance of such contracts and agreements, and also independently of them, the department shall engage in experimental land clearance and revegetation of such lands in the interests of protection and improvement of range and forage lands and shall also engage in such research in connection with it as will enable it to determine the value of such methods in relation to the several purposes and interests of the people of the state as set forth in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4785.

The department shall from time to time prepare reports setting forth data as to experiments conducted and the department’s findings and conclusions with reference to those experiments and submit these reports to the board for its guidance and assistance in determining the policy to be followed by the board with reference to range and forage lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 12.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4786.

In making such experiments and in conducting or supervising land clearance pursuant to the agreements or contracts contemplated by this article, the department shall have available such fire crews and firefighting equipment as it deems reasonably necessary to prevent the spread of any fire from the area proposed to be cleared, if such equipment and fire crews are not needed for the control of wildfire.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4787.

The department, with the approval of the board, may make such regulations as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4788.

The department may accept contributions of money from any private source to carry out the powers and duties imposed upon it by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Forest and Rangeland Resources Assessment and Policy Act of 1977 [4789. - 4789.7.]

4789.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Forest and Rangeland Resources Assessment and Policy Act of 1977.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 835, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4789.1.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) The forest resources of California provide vitally important economic and environmental benefits to the people of California.

(b) Demands on forest resources in California are expected to increase significantly in the next decades.

(c) Forest resources in California are limited.

(d) Better use of forest resources can result where there is good information as to anticipated needs and constraints and the potentials for meeting such needs consistent with Section 4513.

(e) The necessary information is not now available and should be developed.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide for the assessment of California’s forest resources in order to develop and implement forest resources policies for the state.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4801 by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

4789.2.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Board” means the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection.
